California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 258, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5586.5.

The fact that the holder of a license who serves as a qualified professional certifier, as defined in Section 66345.1 of the Government Code, makes any false statement in a certification submission pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 66345) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code constitutes grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.   (AB 671)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5587.

(a) The board may, upon its own initiative or upon the receipt of a complaint, investigate the actions of any person using the title “architect-in-training” pursuant to Section 5500.2, and make findings for those purposes.

(b) The board may suspend or revoke an active authorization to use the title “architect-in-training” approved pursuant to Section 5500.2 for any of the following reasons:

(1) There is no longer a licensed architect responsible for supervising the person using the title “architect-in-training,” regardless of who ended the supervisory arrangement.

(2) The person using the title
 “architect-in-training” committed any act of fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in obtaining the authorization to use that title.

(3) The person using the title “architect-in-training” violated any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board related to this chapter, or aids or abets any person in the violation of this chapter or those regulations.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027.   Repealed as of January 1, 2037, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5587.5.

(a) A licensed architect who is responsible for supervising a person using the title “architect-in-training” pursuant to Section 5500.2 shall be subject to disciplinary actions for any violations of this chapter committed by the person using that title within the course and scope of their employment.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 380, Sec. 3.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027.   Repealed as of January 1, 2037, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5588.

(a) A licensee shall report to the board in writing within 30 days of the date the licensee has knowledge of any civil action judgment, settlement, arbitration award, or administrative action resulting in a judgment, settlement, or arbitration award against the licensee in any action alleging fraud, deceit, negligence, incompetence, or recklessness by the licensee in the practice of architecture if the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater.

(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall be signed by the licensee and shall set forth the facts that constitute the reportable event. If the reportable event involves the action of an administrative agency or court, the report shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The title of the matter.

(2) The court or agency name.

(3) The docket number.

(4) The claim or file number.

(5) The date on which the reportable event occurred.

(c) A licensee shall promptly respond to oral or written inquiries from the board concerning the reportable events, including inquiries made by the board in conjunction with license renewal.

(d) Failure of a licensee to report to the board in the time and manner required by this section shall be grounds for disciplinary action.

(e) Any licensee who fails to comply with this section may be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) as an additional intermediate sanction imposed by the board in lieu of revoking the licensee’s license. Any licensee who knowingly and intentionally fails to comply with this section may be subject to a civil penalty of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) as an additional intermediate sanction imposed by the board in lieu of revoking the licensee’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 564, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5588.1.

(a) Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of a civil action judgment, settlement, or arbitration award described in Section 5588 against a licensee of the board in which the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater, any insurer providing professional liability insurance to that licensee or architectural entity shall report to the board all of the following:

(1) The name of the licensee.

(2) The claim or file number.

(3) The amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award.

(4) The amount paid by the insurer.

(5) The identity of the payee.

(b) Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of any civil action judgment, settlement, or arbitration award described in Section 5588 against a licensee of the board in which the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater, any state or local governmental agency that self insures that licensee shall report to the board all of the following:

(1) The name of the licensee.

(2) The claim or file number.

(3) The amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award.

(4) The amount paid.

(5) The identity of the payee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 506, Sec. 21.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5588.2.

The requirements of Section 5588 and 5588.1 shall apply if a party to the civil action, settlement, arbitration award, or administrative action is or was a sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, corporation, or state or local governmental agency in which a licensee is or was an owner, partner, member, officer, or employee and is or was a licensee in responsible control of that portion of the project that was the subject of the civil judgment, settlement, arbitration award, or administrative action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 506, Sec. 22.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5588.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensee shall not be considered to have violated a confidential settlement agreement or other confidential agreement by providing a report to the board as required by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 506, Sec. 23.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5588.4.

The board may adopt regulations to further define the reporting requirements of Sections 5588 and 5588.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 506, Sec. 24.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5590.

Within 10 days after a judgment by a court of this state that a license holder has committed a crime or is liable for any death, personal or property injury, or loss caused by the license holder’s fraud, deceit, negligence, incompetency, or recklessness in practice, the clerk of the court which rendered the judgment shall report that fact to the board. However, if the judge who tried the matter finds that it does not relate to the defendant’s professional competence or integrity, the judge may, by order, dispense with the requirement that the report be sent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [5600. - 5604.]

5600.

(a) All licenses issued or renewed under this chapter shall expire two years from the last day of the month in which the license was issued or two years from the date on which the renewed license last expired.

(b) To renew an unexpired license, the licenseholder shall, before the time at which the license would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this
 chapter.

(c) The renewal form shall include a statement specifying whether the licensee was convicted of a crime or disciplined by another public agency during the preceding renewal period and that the licensee’s representations on the renewal form are true, correct, and contain no material omissions of fact, to the best knowledge and belief of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 15.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.05.

(a) (1) As a condition of license renewal, a licensee shall complete continuing education coursework pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) (A) Five hours of coursework regarding disability access requirements. The coursework shall include information and practical guidance concerning requirements imposed by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), state laws that govern access to public facilities, and federal and state regulations adopted pursuant to those laws. Coursework provided pursuant to this
 subparagraph shall be presented by trainers or educators with knowledge and
 expertise in these requirements. The board shall promulgate regulations to establish qualifications for courses and course providers by January 1, 2023.

(B) Five hours of coursework regarding zero net carbon design for all renewals occurring on or after January 1, 2023. The coursework shall be presented by trainers or educators with knowledge and expertise in these design requirements. The board shall adopt regulations to establish qualifications for courses and course providers by July 1, 2024.

(b) The board may audit the records of a licensee to verify the completion of the coursework requirements of subdivision (a). A licensee shall maintain records of completion of the required coursework for two years from the date of license renewal, containing the following information: course title, subjects covered, name of provider and trainer or educator, date of completion, number of hours completed, and a statement about the trainer’s or educator’s knowledge and experience background. A licensee shall make those records available to the board for auditing upon request. A licensee who provides false or misleading information as it relates specifically to the requirements of this subdivision shall be subject
 to an administrative citation, which may include an administrative fine pursuant to Section 125.9, or to disciplinary action by the board.

(c) The board shall audit at least 3 percent of the license renewals received each year to verify the completion of the continuing education requirements of this section.

(d) A continuing education provider may submit evidence of coursework to the board directly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   (AB 1010)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.1.

(a) The board shall give written notice to a licensee 30 days in advance of the regular renewal date and shall give written notice 90 days in advance of the expiration of the fifth year that a renewal fee has not been paid.

(b) The
 board shall also notify licensees of the availability of abstract and other informational materials on requirements for interior and exterior barrier-free design to permit access to and use of the architectural environment by the physically handicapped.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 16.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.2.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a license which has expired may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration on filing of application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If a license is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the licenseholder, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the expiration date provided in this chapter which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 566, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.3.

A license which is not renewed within five years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter. The holder of the expired license may apply for and obtain a new license only if they pay all of the fees, and meet all of the requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining an original license, except as follows:

(a) An examination shall not be required if the expired license was issued without an examination.

(b) Examination may be waived by the board if it finds that with due regard for the public interest, the holder of the expired license is qualified to
 practice architecture.

(c) The holder of the expired license shall not be required to meet the qualifications set forth in this chapter relating to education.

The board may, by regulation, authorize the waiver or refund of all or any part of the application fee paid by a person to whom a license is issued without an examination under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 17.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.4.

(a) The board shall issue, upon application and payment of the fee fixed by this chapter, a retired license to an architect who holds a license that is current and active or capable of being renewed pursuant to Section 5600.2 and whose license is not suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(b) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which an active architect’s license is required. An architect holding a retired license shall be permitted to use the title “architect retired” or “retired architect.”

(c) The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that license.

(d) In order for the holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section to restore their license to active status, the holder of a retired license shall comply with Section 5600.2 or 5600.3, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 44.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5601.

Within 10 days after the beginning of every month, all fees collected by the department for the month preceding, under the provisions of this chapter, shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the California Architects Board Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5602.

The money paid into the California Architects Board Fund, which is hereby continued in existence, shall be used in the manner prescribed by law to defray the expenses of the board in carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5603.

The board shall make available to local building departments, and others upon request, an official roster listing the name, license number, and address of all its licensees issued licenses pursuant to this chapter and who are in good standing. The roster shall be open to inspection by the public during office hours of the board. Except for local building departments, the board may charge a fee for the maintenance, publication, and distribution of the roster, not to exceed the actual cost. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the California Architects Board Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.

The fees prescribed by this chapter for architect applicants or architect licenseholders shall be fixed by the board as follows:

(a) The application fee for reviewing a candidate’s eligibility to take any section of the examination shall be one hundred dollars ($100). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(b) The fee for any
 section of the examination administered by the board
 shall be one hundred dollars ($100). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(c) The fee for an original license at an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect at the time the license is issued, except that, if the license is issued less than one year before the date on which it will expire, then the fee shall be fixed at an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect at the time the license is issued. The board may, by appropriate regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of the fee for an original license if the license is issued less than 45 days before the date on which it will expire.

(d) The fee for an application for reciprocity
 shall be one hundred dollars ($100). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(e) The fee for a duplicate license shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of fifty dollars ($50).

(f) The renewal fee
 shall be four hundred dollars ($400). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of six hundred dollars ($600).

(g) The delinquency fee may not exceed 50 percent of the renewal fee.

(h) The fee for a retired license shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and shall not exceed the fee prescribed in subdivision (c).

(i) The fee for a license certification
 shall not exceed forty dollars ($40).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 18.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Architectural Corporations [5610. - 5610.7.]

5610.

A professional architectural corporation is a corporation which is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are licensed architects, are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), this article, and all other statutes and regulations pertaining to the corporation and the conduct of its affairs. With respect to an architectural corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the California Architects Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5610.2.

It is unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter, punishable as specified in Section 5560, for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, this article, or any regulation adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 571, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5610.3.

The name of a professional architectural corporation and any name or names under which it may be rendering professional services shall contain and be restricted to the name or the last name of one or more of the present, prospective, or former shareholders, or of persons who were associated with a predecessor person, partnership, or other organization and whose name or names appeared in the name of the predecessor organization, and shall include either (1) the words “architectural corporation” or (2) the word “architect” or “architects” and wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 566, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5610.4.

Except as provided in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and officer of a professional architectural corporation shall be a licensed person as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 566, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

5610.5.

The income of a professional architectural corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person, as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of that shareholder or their shares in the professional architectural corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 19.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5610.6.

A professional architectural corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute, rule, or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by those statutes, rules, and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license under Section 5551.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 566, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

5610.7.

The board may formulate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, including rules and regulations requiring (a) that the articles of incorporation or bylaws of an architectural corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of the corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act), or a deceased person, shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of the corporation within the time as those rules and regulations may provide, and (b) that an architectural corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its clients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 566, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Landscape Architecture [5615. - 5683.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5615. - 5616.]

5615.

As used in this chapter:

“Landscape architect” means a person who holds a license to practice landscape architecture in this state under the authority of this chapter.

A person who practices landscape architecture within the meaning and intent of this article is a person who offers or performs professional services, for the purpose of landscape preservation, development and enhancement, such as consultation, investigation, reconnaissance, research, planning, design, preparation of drawings, construction documents and specifications, and responsible construction observation. Landscape preservation, development and enhancement is the dominant purpose of services provided by landscape architects. Implementation of that purpose includes: (1) the preservation and aesthetic and functional enhancement of land uses and natural land features; (2) the location and construction of aesthetically pleasing and functional approaches and settings for structures and roadways; and, (3) design for trails and pedestrian walkway systems, plantings, landscape irrigation, landscape lighting, landscape grading and landscape drainage.

Landscape architects perform professional work in planning and design of land for human use and enjoyment. Based on analyses of environmental physical and social characteristics, and economic considerations, they produce overall plans and landscape project designs for integrated land use.

The practice of a landscape architect may, for the purpose of landscape preservation, development and enhancement, include: investigation, selection, and allocation of land and water resources for appropriate uses; feasibility studies; formulation of graphic and written criteria to govern the planning and design of land construction programs; preparation review, and analysis of master plans for land use and development; production of overall site plans, landscape grading and landscape drainage plans, irrigation plans, planting plans, and construction details; specifications; cost estimates and reports for land development; collaboration in the design of roads, bridges, and structures with respect to the functional and aesthetic requirements of the areas on which they are to be placed; negotiation and arrangement for execution of land area projects; field observation and inspection of land area construction, restoration, and maintenance.

This practice shall include the location, arrangement, and design of those tangible objects and features as are incidental and necessary to the purposes outlined herein. Nothing herein shall preclude a duly licensed landscape architect from planning the development of land areas and elements used thereon or from performing any of the services described in this section in connection with the settings, approaches, or environment for buildings, structures, or facilities, in accordance with the accepted public standards of health, safety, and welfare.

This chapter shall not empower a landscape architect, licensed under this chapter, to practice, or offer to practice, architecture or engineering in any of its various recognized branches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 564, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5616.

(a) A landscape architect shall use a written contract when contracting to provide professional services to a client pursuant to this chapter. The written contract shall be executed by the landscape architect and the client, or their representatives, prior to the landscape architect commencing work, unless the client knowingly states in writing that work may be commenced before the contract is executed. The written contract shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of the project for which the client is seeking services.

(2) A description of the services to be provided by the landscape architect to the client.

(3) A description of any basis of compensation applicable to the contract, including the total price that is required to complete the contract, and the method of payment agreed upon by both parties.

(4) A statement in at least 12-point type that reads:

“Landscape architects are licensed by the Landscape Architects Technical Committee located at 2420 Del Paso Road, Suite 105, Sacramento, CA 95834.”

(5) The name, address, and license number of the landscape architect, the name and address of the client, and project address.

(6) A description of the procedure that the landscape architect and client will use to accommodate additional services.

(7) A description of the procedure to be used by either
 party to terminate the contract.

(8) A description of the procedure that the landscape architect and the client will use to accommodate contract changes, including, but not limited to, changes in the description of the project, in the description of the services, or in the description of the compensation, total price, and method of payment.

(9) A statement identifying the ownership and use of instruments of service prepared by the landscape architect.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Professional services rendered by a landscape architect for which the client will not pay compensation.

(2) An arrangement as to the basis for compensation and manner of providing
 professional services implied by the fact that the landscape architect’s services are of the same general kind that the landscape architect has previously rendered to, and received payment from, the same client.

(3) If the client states in writing after full disclosure of this section that a written contract is not required.

(4) Professional services rendered by a landscape architect to any of the following:

(A) A landscape architect licensed under this chapter.

(B) An architect licensed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500).

(C) A professional engineer licensed under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700).

(D) A
 contractor licensed under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000).

(E) A geologist or geophysicist licensed under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 7800).

(F) A professional land surveyor licensed under Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700).

(G) A manufacturing, mining, public utility, research and development, or other industrial corporation, if the services are provided in connection with, or incidental to, the products, systems, or services of that corporation or its affiliates.

(H) A public agency when using that public agency’s written contract.

(c) As used in this section, “written contract” includes a contract that is in electronic
 form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 7.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [5620. - 5630.]

5620.

The duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the California State Board of Landscape Architects that were succeeded to and vested with the Department of Consumer Affairs in accordance with Chapter 908 of the Statutes of 1994 are hereby transferred to the California Architects Board. The Legislature finds that the purpose for the transfer of power is to promote and enhance the efficiency of state government and that assumption of the powers and duties by the California Architects Board shall not be viewed or construed as a precedent for the establishment of state regulation over a profession or vocation that was not previously regulated by a board, as defined in Section 477.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a California Architects Board as defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 5510) of Chapter 3 of Division 3.

Whenever in this chapter “board” is used, it refers to the California Architects Board.

(b) Except as provided herein, the board may delegate its authority under this chapter to the Landscape Architects Technical Committee.

(c) After review of proposed regulations, the board may direct the examining committee to notice and conduct hearings to adopt, amend, or repeal regulations pursuant to Section 5630, provided that the board itself shall take final action to adopt, amend, or repeal those regulations.

(d) The
 board shall not delegate its authority to discipline a landscape architect or to take action against a person who has violated this chapter.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 20.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5620.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Landscape Architects Technical Committee in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5620.2.

(a) The following powers conferred by law upon the board are hereby delegated to and conferred upon the executive officer, or in their absence from the office, to the acting executive officer, as provided below:

(1) Receive and file accusations.

(2) Issue notices of hearings, statements to respondents, and statements of issues.

(3) Receive and file notices of defense.

(4) Determine the time and place of hearings under Section 11508 of the Government Code.

(5) Issue subpoenas and subpoenas
 duces tecum.

(6) Set calendar cases for hearing and perform other functions necessary to the businesslike dispatch of the board in connection with proceedings under Sections 11500 to 11528, inclusive, of the Government Code, before hearing those proceedings.

(7) Approve settlement agreements for the revocation or surrender of a license.

(8) Certification and delivery or mailing of copies of decisions under Section 11518 of the Government Code.

(b) In addition to the powers described in subdivision (a), the following powers are also delegated to and conferred upon the executive officer, as provided below:

(1) Evaluate and determine qualifications and approve applicants for examination under
 Section 5650.

(2) Determine which applicants for reciprocity licenses are entitled to waiver of the written examination under Section 5651.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 376, Sec. 13.   (SB 608)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5621.

(a) There is hereby created within the jurisdiction of the board, a Landscape Architects Technical Committee, hereinafter referred to in this chapter as the landscape architects committee.

(b) The landscape architects committee shall consist of five members who shall be licensed to practice landscape architecture in this state. The Governor shall appoint three of the members. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint one member each.

(c) The initial members to be appointed by the Governor are as follows: one member for a term of one year; one member for a term of two years; and one member for
 a term of three years. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall initially each appoint one member for a term of four years. Thereafter, appointments shall be made for four-year terms, expiring on June 1 of the fourth year and until the appointment and qualification of the member’s successor or until one year shall have elapsed, whichever first occurs. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.

(d) No person shall serve as a member of the landscape architects committee for more than two consecutive terms.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 21.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5622.

(a) The landscape architects committee may assist the board in the examination of candidates for a landscape architect’s license and, after investigation, evaluate and make recommendations regarding potential violations of this chapter.

(b) The landscape architects committee may investigate, assist, and make recommendations to the board regarding the regulation of landscape architects in this state.

(c) The landscape architects committee may perform duties and functions that have been delegated to it by the board pursuant to Section 5620.

(d) The landscape
 architects committee may send a representative to all meetings of the full board to report on the committee’s activities.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 22.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5624.

Each member of the landscape architects committee shall receive per diem and expenses, as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5626.

The executive officer shall keep an accurate record of all proceedings of the landscape architects committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5629.

The board shall prosecute all persons guilty of violating the provisions of this chapter. Except as provided in Section 159.5, the board may employ inspectors, special agents, investigators, and clerical assistance as it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. It may fix the compensation to be paid for those services and incur any additional expense as may be deemed necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5630.

The board may, in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, adopt, amend, or repeal such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to:

(a) Govern the examinations of applicants for licenses to practice landscape architecture.

(b) Establish criteria for approving schools of landscape architecture.

(c) Establish rules or professional conduct that are not inconsistent with state or federal law. Every person who holds a license issued by the board shall be governed and controlled by these rules.

(d) Carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of Chapter [5640. - 5644.]

5640.

It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment, for a person to do any of the following without possessing a valid, unrevoked license as provided in this chapter:

(a) Engage in the practice of landscape architecture.

(b) Use the title or term “landscape architect,” “landscape architecture,” “landscape architectural,” or any other titles, words, or abbreviations that would imply or indicate that they are a landscape architect,
 as defined in Section 5615.

(c) Use the stamp of a licensed landscape architect, as provided in Section 5659.

(d) Advertise or put out a sign, card, or other device that might indicate to the public that they are a licensed landscape architect or qualified to engage in the practice of landscape architecture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 23.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5641.

This chapter shall not be deemed to prohibit any person from preparing drawings for the conceptual design and placement of tangible objects and landscape features or plans, drawings, and specifications for the selection, placement, or use of plants for a single family dwelling. Construction documents, details, or specifications for the tangible objects or landscape features, and alteration of site requiring grading and drainage plans shall be prepared by a licensed professional as required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.)